es: Tipo de longitud de la hoja: Larga; Media; Corta; Otro
fr: Type de longueur de lame: Longue; Moyenne; Courte; Autre
ja: ブレード長さタイプ: ロング; ミディアム; ショート; その他
de: Blattlängentyp: Lang; Mittel; Kurz; Sonstige
cs: Typ délky nože: Dlouhá; Střední; Krátká; Jiné
pt-PT: Tipo de comprimento da lâmina: Comprido; Médio; Curto; Outros
it: Tipo di lunghezza della lama: Lunga; Media; Corta; Altro
lt-LT: Mentės ilgio tipas: Ilgas; Vidutinis; Trumpas; Kita
zh-CN: 蹼片长度类型: 长; 中; 短; 其他
bg-BG: Тип дължина на острието: Дълго; Средно; Късо; Други
da: Klingelængdetype: Lang; Medium; Kort; Andet
ru: Тип длины лезвия: Длинное; Среднее; Короткое; Другое
vi: Loại chiều dài lưỡi: Dài; Vừa; Ngắn; Khác
hr-HR: Duljina oštrice: Duga; Srednja; Kratka; Ostalo
sv: Typ av bladlängd: Lång; Medium; Kort; Övrigt
sl-SI: Vrsta dolžine rezila: Dolgo; Srednje; Kratko; Drugo
pt-BR: Tipo de comprimento da lâmina: Longo; Médio; Curto; Outro
en: Blade length type: Long; Medium; Short; Other
sk-SK: Typ dĺžky čepele: Dlhá; Stredná; Krátka; Iné
tr: Paten bıçağı uzunluğu tipi: Uzun; Orta; Kısa; Diğer
zh-TW: 刀片長度類型: 長; 中; 短; 其他
fi: Terän pituustyyppi: Pitkä; Keskipitkä; Lyhyt; Muu
th: ประเภทความยาวใบฟิน: ยาว; ปานกลาง; สั้น; อื่นๆ
el: Τύπος μήκους λεπίδας: Μακρύ; Μεσαίο; Κοντό; Άλλο
nl: Type bladlengte: Lang; Medium; Kort; Anders
hu: Pengehossz típusa: Hosszú; Közepes; Rövid; Egyéb
ro-RO: Tipul lungimii lamei: Lung; Mediu; Scurt; Altele
ko: 블레이드 길이 유형: 롱; 미디엄; 쇼트; 기타
pl: Typ długości ostrza: Długie; Średnie; Krótkie; Inne
nb: Type bladlengde: Lang; Medium; Kort; Annet